Wyoming statutes. Title 25 Institutions of the State
Chapter 2 State Penitentiary

Cross references. —

As to general supervision and control of penal institutions by department of corrections, see §

25-1-104

.

For constitutional provision as to conduct of jails, see art. 1, § 16, Wyo. Const.

As to pardoning power of governor, see art. 4, § 5, Wyo. Const.

For constitutional provision as to the establishment of charitable and penal institutions under the supervision of the state board of charities and reform, see art. 7, § 18, Wyo. Const.

For provision fixing the location of the Wyoming state hospital and the Wyoming state penitentiary, see art. 7, § 23, Wyo. Const.

As to unlawful conduct within governmental facilities, see §§

6-6-301

through

6-6-307

.

As to public facility life-cycle cost analysis, see §§

16-6-401

through

16-6-403

.

As to public health and safety generally in state institutions, see title 35.

As to welfare provisions relating to state institutions generally, see title 42.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

60 Am. Jur. 2d Penal and Correctional Institutions § 1 et seq.

Civil liability of officer charged with keeping jail or prison for death or injury of prisoner, 14 ALR2d 3534.

Withdrawal, forfeiture, modification or denial of good-time allowance to prisoner, 95 ALR2d 1265.

Provisions of religious facilities for prisoners, 12 ALR3d 1276.

Institution for punishment or rehabilitation of criminals, delinquents or alcoholics as enjoinable nuisance, 21 ALR3d 1058.

Liability of prison authorities for injury to prisoner directly caused by assault by other prisoner, 41 ALR3d 1021.

Censorship of mail of convicted prisoners, 47 ALR3d 1150.

Prison conditions as amounting to cruel and unusual punishment, 51 ALR3d 111.

Censorship of mail of unconvicted prisoners, 52 ALR3d 548.

Civil liability of prison or jail authorities for self-inflicted injury or death of prisoner, 79 ALR3d 1210.

Right of state prison authorities to administer neuroleptic or antipsychotic drugs to prisoner without his or her consent—state cases, 75 ALR4th 1124.

State prisoner's right to personally appear at civil trial to which he is a party — state court cases, 82 ALR4th 1063.

Relief, under federal Civil Rights Acts, to state prisoners complaining of conditions relating to corporal punishment, punitive segregation or other similar physical disciplinary measures, 18 ALR Fed 7.

Relief, under federal Civil Rights Acts, to state prisoners complaining of interference with access to courts, 23 ALR Fed 6.

Relief, under federal Civil Rights Acts, to state prisoners complaining of denial of medical care, 28 ALR Fed 279.

Fourth amendment as protecting prison visitor against unreasonable searches and seizures, 69 ALR Fed 856.

72 C.J.S. Prisons § 1 et seq.

§ 25-2-101.
Seal of warden; copies of papers displaying seal received as evidence.

The warden of the penitentiary shall have an official seal bearing the words “Warden of the Penitentiary of the State of Wyoming” of which the courts of this state shall take judicial notice.

When the official seal of the warden is affixed to copies of papers, books and records kept in his office, the copies are competent evidence in the courts and have the same force and effect as the originals.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 59, §§ 1, 2; R.S. 1931, §§ 108-805, 108-806; C.S. 1945, §§ 19-1015, 19-1016; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-380, 9-381; W.S. 1977, §§

9-6-101

,

9-6-102

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 25-2-102.
Authority to establish and maintain penitentiary farms; disposition of funds from sales or services; supervision.

The state may establish, maintain and operate one (1) or more penitentiary farms and camps as needed to provide a place of confinement and employment of convicted felons sentenced to the custody of the department of corrections to serve a term of imprisonment in a state penal institution.

All funds received from the sale of products or services produced on penitentiary farms and camps shall be credited to a separate account.

All penitentiary farms and camps established shall be operated and maintained under the general supervision of the department of corrections.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 75, §§ 1, 3, 4; R.S. 1931, §§ 108-821, 108-823, 108-824; C.S. 1945, §§ 19-1017, 19-1019, 19-1020; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-386, 9-388, 9-389; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-6-140 to 9-6-142; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; ch. 71, § 1; 1986, ch. 65, § 1; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (b), substituted “a separate account” for “the intragovernmental fund.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 25-2-103.
Wyoming women's center; establishment; purpose; supervision.

The Wyoming women’s center is established at Lusk, Wyoming, to provide a place of confinement, employment and training for convicted female felons sentenced to the custody of the department of corrections to serve a term of imprisonment in a state penal institution.

The Wyoming women’s center shall be operated and maintained under the general supervision of the department of corrections.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 40, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-164; Laws 1981, ch. 16, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1992, ch. 25, § 3.

§ 25-2-104.
Wyoming correctional facility; establishment; purpose; supervision.

The Wyoming correctional facility is established at Torrington, Wyoming, to provide a place of confinement, employment and training for convicted felons sentenced to the custody of the department of corrections to serve a term of imprisonment in a state penal institution.

The Wyoming correctional facility shall be operated and maintained under the general supervision of the department of corrections.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 245, § 1; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 2005, ch. 93, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a) substituted “Torrington” for “Lovell.”